lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Knygų priedai: Knygų viršeliai; Skaitymo lempos; Knygų stovai ir atramos; Knygų skirtukai
da: Kontorforsyning > Bøger – tilbehør: Bogomslag; Bøger – læselamper; Bogholdere; Bogmærker
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Kirjatarvikkeet: Kirjan kannet; Kirjavalot; Kirjatelineet ja -tuet; Kirjanmerkit
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Dodatki za knjige: Ovitki za knjige; Bralne lučke; Stojala in nasloni za knjige; Knjižna kazala
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Phụ kiện cho sách: Bìa bọc sách; Đèn đọc sách; Giá để sách; Đánh dấu trang
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์หนังสือ: ปกหนังสือ; ไฟอ่านหนังสือ; ที่ตั้งและวางหนังสือ; ที่คั่นหนังสือ
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Kitap Aksesuarları: Kitap Kapakları; Kitap Okuma Lambaları; Kitap Dayanakları ve Rahleler; Ayraçlar
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Αξεσουάρ βιβλίου: Εξώφυλλα βιβλίου; Φώτα βιβλίου; Βάσεις και στηρίγματα βιβλίου; Σελιδοδείκτες
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Doplňky ke knihám: Obaly na knihy; Lampičky na čtení; Stojany na knihy; Záložky
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Аксессуары для книг: Обложки для книг; Лампы для книг; Подставки для книг; Закладки
de: Bürobedarf > Bücherzubehör: Bucheinbände; Leselicht; Buchständer & -stützen; Lesezeichen
en: Office Supplies > Book Accessories: Book Covers; Book Lights; Book Stands & Rests; Bookmarks
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Acessórios para livros: Capas de livros; Luminárias para leitura; Suportes e descansos para livros; Marcadores de livros
ko: 사무용품 > 독서용품: 책 커버; 독서등; 독서대; 책갈피
it: Forniture per ufficio > Accessori per libri: Copertine per libri; Lampade da lettura; Leggii per libri; Segnalibri
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 書本配件: 書衣; 夾書燈; 看書架; 書籤
ja: オフィス用品 > 書籍関連用品: ブックカバー; 読書灯; ブックスタンド・ブックレスト; しおり
es: Material de oficina > Accesorios para libros: Cubiertas para libros; Luces de lectura; Bases y atriles para libros; Marcapáginas
hu: Irodai kellékek > Könyvkiegészítők: Könyvborítók; Könyvfények; Könyvállványok és -támaszok; Könyvjelzők
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 书籍用具: 书皮; 夹书灯; 阅读架; 书签
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Boktillbehör: Bokomslag; Läslampor; Bokstöd och bokställ; Bokmärken
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Аксесоари за книги: Корици на книги; Осветителни тела за книги; Стойки и поставки за книги; Отметки за книги
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Dodaci za čitanje: Omoti za knjige; Lampa za čitanje; Stalci i držači za knjige; Označivač stranica
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Boekaccessoires: Boekomslagen; Boekenlampjes; Boekstandaarden en -steunen; Bladwijzers
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Acessórios para livros: Capas para livros; Iluminação para livros; Prateleiras e apoios para livros; Marcadores de livros
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Príslušenstvo pre knihy: Obaly na knihy; Lampy na čítanie; Stojany a opierky na knihy; Záložky
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Accessoires pour livres: Couvertures de livres; Lampes de lecture; Porte-livres; Marque-pages
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Accesorii pentru cărți: Coperți pentru cărți; Veioze pentru cărți; Standuri și suporturi pentru cărți; Semne de carte
nb: Kontormateriell > Boktilbehør: Boktrekk; Boklys; Bokstativer; Bokmerker
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Akcesoria do książek: Okładki do książek; Lampki do czytania; Pulpity i podpórki do czytania; Zakładki